Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Chapter 01. Centralized Licensing.
Sec. 08.01.089.
Copies of records for child support purposes.

If a copy of a public record concerning an individual who owes or is owed child support that is prepared or maintained by the department is requested by the child support services agency created in AS

25.27.010

or a child support enforcement agency of another state, the department shall provide the requesting agency with a certified copy of the public record, including the individual’s social security number. If these records are prepared or maintained by the department in an electronic data base, the records may be supplied by providing the requesting agency with a copy of the electronic record and a statement certifying its contents. A requesting agency receiving information under this section may use it only for child support purposes authorized under law.

History.

(§ 7 ch 87 SLA 1997)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, “child support enforcement agency created in AS

25.27.010

” was changed to “child support services agency created in AS

25.27.010

” in this section in accordance with § 12(a), ch. 107, SLA 2004.

Sec. 08.01.090.
Applicability of the Administrative Procedure Act.

The Administrative Procedure Act (AS 44.62) applies to regulations adopted and proceedings held under this chapter, except those under AS

08.01.087(b)

and actions taken under AS

08.68.333(c)

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 59 SLA 1966; am § 4 ch 258 SLA 1976; am § 2 ch 2 SLA 1998)

Sec. 08.01.100.
License renewal, lapse, and reinstatement.

Licenses shall be renewed biennially on the dates set by the department with the approval of the respective board.

A license subject to renewal shall be renewed on or before the date set by the department. If the license is not renewed by the date set by the department, the license lapses. In addition to renewal fees required for reinstatement of the lapsed license, the department may impose a delayed renewal penalty, established by regulation, that shall be paid before a license that has been lapsed for more than 60 days may be renewed. The department may adopt a delayed renewal penalty only with the concurrence of the appropriate board.

Except as provided in (f) of this section, when continuing education or other requirements are made a condition of license renewal, the requirements shall be satisfied before a license is renewed.

Except as otherwise provided, a license may not be renewed if it has been lapsed for five years or more.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this title, a renewal of a license may not be issued by the department to a natural person unless the licensee’s social security number has been provided to the department.

The department may establish and implement a waiver of continuing education requirements for renewal of a license regulated by the department and a board may establish and implement a waiver of continuing education requirements for renewal of a license regulated by the board for the period in which a licensee is engaged in active duty military service in the armed forces of the United States.

A member of the armed forces of the United States on active duty in a combat zone, danger pay post, or qualified hazardous duty area, who is a licensee under this title in good standing at the time of the licensee’s active duty order is exempt from any fees or other requirements to maintain that license or good standing while the licensee is in that zone, at that post, or in that area. This exemption is valid for 180 days after returning to the licensee’s permanent duty station, if the licensee does not engage in licensed practice for profit in the private sector. The licensee shall pay fees and meet all other requirements for the license period beginning after the exemption ends. In this subsection,

“combat zone” has the meaning given in 26 U.S.C. 112(c)(2) (Internal Revenue Code);

“danger pay post” means a post so designated by the United States Secretary of State in the Department of State Standardized Regulations for purposes of danger pay under 5 U.S.C. 5928;

“qualified hazardous duty area” means an area that, during the applicant’s deployment, is treated as if it were a combat zone for purposes of a federal tax exemption under 26 U.S.C. 112 (Internal Revenue Code).

History.

(§ 1 ch 59 SLA 1966; am § 2 ch 94 SLA 1968; am § 3 ch 49 SLA 1980; am § 1 ch 56 SLA 1980; am § 1 ch 58 SLA 1980; am § 1 ch 75 SLA 1980; am § 1 ch 130 SLA 1980; am § 1 ch 162 SLA 1980; am § 2 ch 166 SLA 1980; am § 3 ch 37 SLA 1985; am §§ 8 — 10 ch 94 SLA 1987; am § 8 ch 87 SLA 1997; am §§ 2, 3 ch 63 SLA 2005; am § 2 ch 25 SLA 2011)

Administrative Code. —

For collection of fees, see 12 AAC 2, art. 1.

For occupational licensing fees, see 12 AAC 2, art. 2.

For continuing education, see 12 AAC 4, art. 6.

For license renewal and continuing competency, see 12 AAC 5, art. 2.

For application requirements and licensing, see 12 AAC 12, art. 1.

For renewal and continuing competency requirements, see 12 AAC 14, art. 4.

For continuing education, see 12 AAC 16, art. 3.

For residential contractor endorsement, see 12 AAC 21, art. 4.

For renewal and reinstatement, see 12 AAC 22, art. 2.

For registration and licensing, see 12 AAC 36, art. 1.

For licensing, see 12 AAC 40, art. 1.

For continuing medical education, see 12 AAC 40, art. 3.

For mobile intensive care paramedics, see 12 AAC 40, art. 4.

For physician assistants, see 12 AAC 40, art. 5.

For licenses, permits, and examinations, see 12 AAC 42, art. 1.

For examinations and licensure, see 12 AAC 44, art. 3.

For certified nurse aide, see 12 AAC 44, art. 8.

For license renewal and continuing education requirements, see 12 AAC 52, art. 3.

For licensing requirements, see 12 AAC 56, art. 1.

For license renewal and reinstatement; continuing education, see 12 AAC 62, art. 3.

For veterinary licensing and examination, see 12 AAC 68, art. 1.

For guide license qualifications, see 12 AAC 75, art. 1.

For transportation services, see 12 AAC 75, art. 4.

Sec. 08.01.102.
Citation for unlicensed practice or activity.

The department may issue a citation for a violation of a license requirement under this chapter, except a requirement to have a license under AS 43.70, if there is probable cause to believe a person has practiced a profession or engaged in business for which a license is required without holding the license. Each day a violation continues after a citation for the violation has been issued constitutes a separate violation. A citation issued under this section must comply with the standards adopted under AS

12.25.175

—

12.25.230

.

History.

(§ 11 ch 94 SLA 1987; am § 5 ch 45 SLA 1988; am § 2 ch 104 SLA 2008; am § 9 ch 29 SLA 2010)

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 61, ch. 29, SLA 2010, the 2010 amendment of this section applies “to all citations issued . . . for violations occurring on or after July 1, 2010.”

Sec. 08.01.103.
Procedure and form of citation.

A person receiving the citation issued under AS

08.01.102

is not required to sign a notice to appear in court.

The time specified in the notice to appear on a citation issued under AS

08.01.102

shall be at least five working days after the issuance of the citation.

The department is responsible for the issuance of books containing appropriate citations and shall maintain a record of each book issued and each citation contained in it. The department shall require and retain a receipt for every book issued to an employee of the department.

On or before the 10th working day after the issuance of a citation, the department shall deposit the original or a copy of the citation with a court having jurisdiction over the alleged offense. Upon its deposit with the court, the citation may be disposed of only by trial in the court or other official action taken by the magistrate, judge, or prosecutor. The department may not dispose of a citation, copies of it, or the record of its issuance except as required under this subsection and (e) of this section.

The department shall require the return of a copy of every citation issued by the department and all copies of a citation that has been spoiled or upon which an entry has been made and not issued to an alleged violator. The department shall also maintain, in connection with each citation, a record of the disposition of the charge by the court where the original or copy of the citation was deposited.

A citation issued under AS

08.01.102

is considered to be a lawful complaint for the purpose of prosecution.

History.

(§ 11 ch 94 SLA 1987; am §§ 10 — 13 ch 29 SLA 2010)

Editor’s notes. —

Under § 61, ch. 29, SLA 2010, the 2010 amendments to (a), (b), (d), and (f) of this section apply “to all citations issued . . . for violations occurring on or after July 1, 2010.”

Sec. 08.01.104.
Failure to obey citation.

Unless the citation has been voided or otherwise dismissed by the magistrate, judge, or prosecutor, a person who without lawful justification or excuse fails to appear in court to answer a citation issued under AS

08.01.102

, regardless of the disposition of the charge for which the citation was issued, is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 11 ch 94 SLA 1987)

Sec. 08.01.105.
Penalty for improper payment.

An applicant shall pay a penalty of $10 each time a negotiable instrument is presented to the department in payment of an amount due and payment is subsequently refused by the named payor.

History.

(§ 3 ch 258 SLA 1976)

Sec. 08.01.110.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“board” includes the boards and commissions listed in AS

08.01.010

;

“commissioner” means the commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development;

“department” means the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development;

“license” means a business license or a license, certificate, permit, or registration or similar evidence of authority issued for an occupation by the department or by one of the boards listed in AS

08.01.010

;

“licensee” means a person who holds a license;

“occupation” means a trade or profession listed in AS

08.01.010

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 59 SLA 1966; am § 40 ch 218 SLA 1976; am § 5 ch 258 SLA 1976; am § 5 ch 56 SLA 1986; am § 5 ch 131 SLA 1986; am § 6 ch 45 SLA 1988; am § 3 ch 21 SLA 1991)

Revisor’s notes. —

Minor word changes were made in (4) of this section in 1986 to reconcile amendments made to the paragraph by chapters 56 and 131, SLA 1986.

Reorganized in 1986 to alphabetize the defined terms.

In 1999, “commissioner of commerce and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of community and economic development” and “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, “commissioner of community and economic development” was changed to “commissioner of commerce, community, and economic development” in paragraph (2) and “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development” in paragraph (3), in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.